Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5069.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin UNIVERSITY OF MINNESOTA WEST CENTRAL RESEARCH AND OUTREACH CENTER.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $20,000,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for research and educational dairy facilities at the University of Minnesota West Central Research and Outreach Center. Of this amount, $7,740,000 is for phase 1 of this project, to design, construct, furnish, and equip upgrades for the HVAC system; renovate the utility room, staff restrooms, and shower rooms; construct a new truck weigh station and transfer alley; and equip a milking facility, including robotic or autonomous milking and sanitation equipment, feed mills, and grain storage facilities. Of this amount, $12,260,000 is for phase 2 of this project, to design, construct, furnish, and equip a new building on the site with a cow milking parlor, veterinary treatment area, feeding area, and holding area and areas for research, education, and administrative functions to support the facility. Phase 2 further includes the construction of concrete pads, road access, utilities, and manure and waste water containment facilities on the site. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $20,000,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end